Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2084.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 163.1 of Title 51, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. “Faculty member” means any regular faculty member as defined
by the applicable policy of the subject institution;
2. “Institution” means any institution within The Oklahoma
State System of Higher Education, the governing body of any
institution within The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education, an
employee of an institution within The Oklahoma State System of
Higher Education, and a member of the governing body of any

institution within The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education;
and
3. “Wrongful termination claim” means any claim, cause of
action, complaint, grievance, lawsuit, or demand for monetary or
equitable relief, arising under state law alleging wrongful
termination of an employee.
B. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the
total amount paid by an institution to a faculty member to resolve a
wrongful termination claim under state law, whether by voluntary
settlement between the institution and the faculty member,
arbitration award, or court judgment, shall not exceed an amount
equal to two (2) years of the faculty member’s base salary,
compensation, or contractual benefit, as of the date of termination.
Such limitation shall include, but not be limited to, back pay,
compensatory damages, liquidated damages, and any other monetary
relief, but shall not include retirement contributions already
earned by the faculty member or accrued unpaid wages or leave
accrued by the faculty member.
C. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any
written contract, whether dated prior to, on, or after the effective
date of this act, related to the institution and executed between
the institution and an employee of the institution who is not a
faculty member as defined in subsection A of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 2084 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 26th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 2084 Page 3